nl: Baanoppervlak geschiktheid: Binnen; Binnen/Buiten; Buiten; Overige
es: Idoneidad de la superficie de la cancha: Interior; Interior/Exterior; Exterior; Otro
ko: 코트 표면 적합성: 실내; 실내/야외; 야외; 기타
lt-LT: Tinkamumas aikštelės paviršiui: Vidaus patalpos; Vidus / laukas; Laukas; Kita
en: Court surface suitability: Indoor; Indoor/Outdoor; Outdoor; Other
fi: Kentän alustan sopivuus: Sisäkäyttö; Sisä-/ulkokäyttö; Ulkokäyttö; Muu
hr-HR: Prikladnost površine terena: Unutarnji; Unutarnji / vanjski; Vanjski; Ostalo
pl: Przydatność do nawierzchni boiska: Wewnętrzna (hala); Wewnętrzna/Zewnętrzna; Zewnętrzna; Inna
vi: Độ phù hợp với bề mặt sân: Trong nhà; Trong nhà/Ngoài trời; Ngoài trời; Khác
th: ความเหมาะสมของพื้นสนาม: ในร่ม; ในร่ม/กลางแจ้ง; กลางแจ้ง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适用球场地面类型: 室内; 室内/室外; 室外; 其他
ja: コート表面の適合性: 屋内; 屋内 / 屋外; 屋外; その他
sk-SK: Vhodnosť povrchu ihriska: Do interiéru; Do interiéru/exteriéru; Do exteriéru; Iné
hu: Pályafelületnek való megfelelőség: Beltéri; Beltéri/kültéri; Kültéri; Egyéb
fr: Surface de terrain adaptée: Intérieur; Intérieur/extérieur; Extérieur; Autre
sv: Lämplighet för banunderlag: Inomhus; Inomhus/utomhus; Utomhus; Övrigt
cs: Vhodnost pro povrch hřiště: Vnitřní; Vnitřní / venkovní; Venkovní; Ostatní
ru: Совместимость с типом покрытия корта: В помещении; В помещении и на улице; На улице; Другое
pt-BR: Adequação da superfície da quadra: Ambiente interno; Ambiente interno/externo; Ambiente externo; Outros
da: Banebelægningens egnethed: Indendørs; Indendørs/udendørs; Udendørs; Andet
pt-PT: Adequação da superfície da quadra: Interior; Interior/exterior; Exterior; Outro
zh-TW: 球場表面適用性: 室內; 室內/室外; 室外; 其他
ro-RO: Adecvarea suprafeței terenului: Interior; Interior / Exterior; Exterior; Altele
el: Καταλληλότητα επιφάνειας γηπέδου: Εσωτερικού χώρου; Εσωτερικού/Εξωτερικού χώρου; Εξωτερικού χώρου; Άλλο
bg-BG: Подходящост на настилката на корта: На закрито; На закрито/На открито; На открито; Други
it: Idoneità della superficie del campo: Indoor; Indoor/Outdoor; Outdoor; Altro
nb: Egnethet for baneoverflaten: Innendørs; Innendørs/utendørs; Utendørs; Annet
sl-SI: Primernost površine igrišča: Notranja uporaba; Notranja/zunanja uporaba; Zunanja uporaba; Drugo
tr: Saha yüzeyi uygunluğu: Kapalı alan; Kapalı alan/Açık alan; Açık alan; Diğer
de: Eignung für Spielfeldoberflächen: Indoor; Indoor/Outdoor; Outdoor; Andere